District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Sensible Pool Building Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 11 of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-
234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.10) is amended by adding new subsections (a-1) and (a-2) as
follows:
“(a-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a District government project in
Ward 8 that includes the construction of a natatorium shall be exempted from the requirements to
maintain net zero energy compliance, as that term is defined in section 2(a)(3) of the Clean
Energy DC Building Code Amendment Act of 2022, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law
24-177; D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01(a)(3)).


“(a-2) Any natatorium constructed by the District shall be built to at least LEED Silver
standards as determined by the Department of Buildings.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4 Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code §1-204.12(a)).